North Carolina, session 2025, HB275.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-175.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-175.2. Right-of-way at crossings, intersections and traffic-control signal points; white
cane or guide dog to serve as signal for the blind.
At any street, road or highway crossing or intersection, where the movement of traffic is not
regulated by a traffic officer or by traffic-control signals, any blind or partially blind pedestrian
shall be entitled to the right-of-way at such crossing or intersection, if such blind or partially
blind pedestrian shall extend before him at arm's length a cane white in color or white tipped with
red, or if such person is accompanied by a guide dog. Upon receiving such a signal, all vehicles
at or approaching such intersection or crossing shall come to a full stop, leaving a clear lane
through which such pedestrian may pass, and such vehicle shall remain stationary until such blind
or partially blind pedestrian has completed the passage of such crossing or intersection. At any
street, road or highway crossing or intersection, where the movement of traffic is regulated by
traffic-control signals, blind or partially blind pedestrians shall be entitled to the right-of-way if
such person having such cane or accompanied by a guide dog shall be partly across such crossing
or intersection at the time the traffic-control signals change, and all vehicles shall stop and remain
stationary until such pedestrian has completed passage across the intersection or crossing. Any
person who fails to yield the right-of-way to a blind or partially blind pedestrian as required by
this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-160.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-160.1. Failure to yield causing serious bodily injury; penalties.
(a) Unless the conduct is covered under some other law providing greater punishment, a
person who commits the offense of failure to yield while approaching or entering an intersection,
turning at a stop or yield sign, entering a roadway, upon the approach of an emergency vehicle,
or at highway construction or maintenance shall be punished under this section. When there is
and causes serious bodily injury but no death resulting from the violation, the violator death is
guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, which shall be fined include a fine of five hundred dollars
($500.00) and and, upon conviction, revocation of the violator's drivers license or commercial
drivers license shall be suspended for 90 days.
(b) As used in this section, "serious bodily injury" means bodily injury that involves a
substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or
protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty."
*H275-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 275-Second Edition